Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 1. In General
§ 16-1-109.
State loan and investment board loans; amount; interest; security; conditions.

The state loan and investment board may negotiate and make loans to one (1) or more agencies, the University of Wyoming, or joint powers boards presently existing, permitted or created pursuant to the statutes, from the permanent mineral trust funds and other permanent funds of Wyoming not otherwise obligated, not to exceed sixty million dollars ($60,000,000.00) including all loans previously made and outstanding, and not to exceed a term of forty (40) years for repayment. The board shall set rates of interest on all such loans according to the current rates of interest for similar securities on the commercial market upon a basis which will not be less than the average rate of return realized on all permanent mineral trust fund investments as determined by the state treasurer for the five (5) calendar years immediately preceding the year in which the loan is made. For all loans under this section approved after July 1, 1996, a loan origination fee of one percent (1%) of the loan shall be paid to the state loan and investment board by the borrowing agency, university or joint powers board. The revenue produced by this fee shall be credited to the loss reserve account as provided by W.S.

16-1-110

.

In making loans pursuant to this act, the state loan and investment board shall establish requirements and standards which it determines to be necessary and advisable.

Upon approval of a loan, an agency, the university, participating agencies, or a joint powers board shall transfer title or its interest to the property upon which facilities are to be constructed, including later improvements, to the state loan and investment board, or the state loan and investment board may require the security it deems necessary. The recipient of the loan shall make reasonable annual rental charges or loan payments as specified by the state loan and investment board. Upon repayment of the loan, title to or interest in the property and improvements shall be reconveyed to the appropriate agency, university, participating agencies or joint powers board. Where the transfer of title or interest in the property would preclude the obtaining of federal grants or where transfer of title or interest is prohibited by or would be in violation of existing grant-in-aid agreements, the state loan and investment board may waive the requirements of transfer of title or transfer of any interest in the property, and substitute other security of sufficient value as it deems necessary.

Loans under this section shall be made only under the following conditions:

Loans shall be made only for facilities generating user fees only to the extent that the user fees will repay the loan such that the loan can be considered a reasonable and prudent investment of state permanent funds. Any portion of the revenue generating facility unable to be financed by user fees may be financed by a grant under W.S. 9-4-604(g) and (h) to agencies and joint powers boards otherwise authorized to receive grants under those provisions;

No security other than a lien on the facilities used to generate user fees to repay the loan and pledges of user fees shall be taken to secure the loan except that the entity or joint powers board receiving the loan may also be required to issue revenue bonds to the state to evidence the loan if statutory authority exists for the entity to issue revenue bonds for the facility. No property shall be taken as security unless the property is owned by the entity to which the loan will be made. Upon repayment of the loan, liens against the property and revenue shall be released by the state loan and investment board;

Loans shall be made to the governmental entity or entities whose inhabitants receive a direct service or benefit from the revenue generating facility;

The state loan and investment board shall receive annual financial statements from entities receiving loans under this subsection;

No loan shall be made without the written opinion of the attorney general certifying the legality of the transaction and all documents connected therewith;

The board shall request a review and recommendation from the aeronautics commission on all applications for loans for the construction, development and improvement of airport facilities generating user fees and shall make any loan recommended by the aeronautics commission unless, based upon the credit worthiness of the project, the board determines the loan would not be a prudent investment.

The board, whenever it deems necessary for the better protection of permanent funds of the state invested in loans under this section, may refinance any delinquent loan and reamortize the loan over not more than thirty (30) years from the date of refinancing. All costs of refinancing the loan shall be paid by the borrowing entity and no loan shall be refinanced where it appears refinancing will jeopardize the collection of the loan. An additional fee of one percent (1%) of the amount of the reamortized loan shall be paid by the borrowing entity to the board to be credited to the loss reserve account created by W.S.

16-1-110

as provided by subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-18.20; Laws 1975, ch. 178, § 1; 1976, ch. 9, § 1; ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-1-136; Laws 1979, ch. 118, § 1; ch. 160, § 2; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 1; 1982, ch. 6, § 1; ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 68, § 1; 1996, ch. 98, § 2; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 1999, ch. 75, § 1; 2000, ch. 65, § 2; 2008, ch. 60, § 1; ch. 113, § 2; 2010, ch. 8, § 1; ch. 69, § 203; 2019 ch. 35, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to creation of the state loan and investment board, see §

11-34-102

.

As to other authorized loans by the state loan and investment board, see §

11-34-103

and §§

11-34-301

through

11-34-304

.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 60, § 1, in (a) added “the University of Wyoming” and substituted “sixty million dollars ($60,000,000)” for “thirty million dollars ($30,000,000)” in the first sentence, substituted “shall set rates of interest on all such loans” for “may set rates of interest on all such loans to joint powers boards” and “the average rate of return realized on all permanent mineral trust fund investments as determined by the state treasurer for the five (5) calendar years immediately preceding the year in which the loan is made” for “six percent (6%) nor more than twelve percent (12%)” in the second sentence, added “university” in the third sentence; (c) added “the university” in the first sentence, added “university” in the third sentence; (d)(i) added “to agencies and joint powers boards otherwise authorized to receive grants under those provisions” at the end.

Laws 2008, ch. 60 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 113, § 2, effective July 1, 2008, deleted the former last sentence of (a) which read: “The limitation on legislatively designated investments under W.S.

9-4-712

applies to this investment.”

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, by ch. 8, § 1, effective July 1, 2010, added (e).

The second 2010 amendment, by ch. 69, § 203, effective July 1, 2010, in (d), deleted “For all loans made prior to July 1, 1979, all tangible personal and real property pledged for the repayment of loans under this section, excluding pledges of revenue or property generating user fees to repay the loans, is released as security for any loans under this section and the state loan and investment board shall have prepared, execute and have filed all necessary instruments to carry out this provision. Effective July 1, 1979” at the beginning.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (d)(vi).

Liberal construction. —

Section 2, ch. 21, Laws 1974, reads: “This act is intended to permit local governmental units to make the most efficient use of their powers enabling them to cooperate with each other on a basis of mutual advantage and to thereby provide services and facilities in a manner and pursuant to forms of governmental organization which will accord best with geographic, economic, population and other factors influencing the needs and development of local communities. To this end this act is to be liberally construed.”

Purpose of act. —

Section 5, ch. 160, Laws 1979, reads: “The purpose of this act is to restructure and refinance specified state grant and loan programs for counties and cities without increasing or creating new state taxes.”

Severability. —

Section 3, ch. 21, Laws 1974, reads: “If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application. To this end the provisions of this act are severable.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (b), see § 16-1-103(a)(ii).

§ 16-1-110.
Loss reserve account created; deposits; disposition of funds.

Revenues received by the state loan and investment board for deposit in the loss reserve account pursuant to W.S.

16-1-109

(a) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit to the credit of the loss reserve account. Funds in the account shall be used for the purposes specified in subsection (b) of this section and to pay the administrative and legal expenses of the board in making collections and foreclosing on loans made pursuant to W.S.

16-1-109

. If at the end of any fiscal year, the amount in the loss reserve account exceeds five percent (5%) of the total amount of permanent funds invested by the state in loans pursuant to W.S. 16-1-109, the amount in excess of the five percent (5%) shall be transferred and credited to the general fund.

If, as a result of default in the payment of any loan made pursuant to W.S.

16-1-109

, there occurs a nonrecoverable loss either to the corpus of, or interest due to, any permanent fund of the state, the state loan and investment board shall restore the loss to the permanent fund account entitled thereto using any funds available in the loss reserve account created by subsection (a) of this section. If the funds in the loss reserve account are insufficient to restore the full amount of the loss, the board shall submit a detailed report of the loss to the legislature and shall request an appropriation to restore the balance of the loss to the permanent fund account entitled thereto.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 98, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 113, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “subsection (b) of this section” for “W.S. 9-4-703(e)” in (a); added (b).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 16-1-111.
Loans to political subdivisions; requirements; limitations; rulemaking.

The state loan and investment board may negotiate and make loans from the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund to political subdivisions of this state as provided in this section. The aggregate sum of all outstanding loans made under this section shall not exceed four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000.00). The aggregate sum of outstanding loans made for infrastructure projects shall not exceed two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000.00) and shall not exceed two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000.00) for road or street projects. Loans may be made for infrastructure projects and street and road projects as provided in this section. The board shall adopt rules and procedures as it deems advisable or necessary to administer the program. The rules shall include requirements and standards which the board determines to be necessary or advisable in accordance with the following:

To qualify for a loan an applicant shall demonstrate:

A commitment to adequately maintain the project for which the loan is requested during a reasonable period of time;

That all project costs will be funded at the time of receipt of the loan, with funding sources specified within the project application;

Compliance with any other criteria developed by the board consistent with this section.

The determination of whether to make a loan shall include consideration of:

The contribution of the project to health, safety and welfare;

The applicant’s need for the project and financial needs of the applicant in relation to the project;

The ability of the applicant to repay the loan.

Loans may be made to cities, towns, counties, school districts and community college districts for infrastructure projects. A loan under this subsection shall be at an interest rate of one percent (1%) plus seventy-five thousandths of one percent (.075%) for each year of the loan term in excess of five (5) years. In the event of prepayment of a loan, the interest rate shall be calculated at the actual loan period, but no refund of interest payment shall be made to the borrowing entity. Any loan made under this subsection shall be for a term of not fewer than five (5) years and not greater than twenty-five (25) years for repayment. Adequate security for loans shall be required and may include:

A pledge of the revenues from the project for which the loan was granted;

A pledge of other revenues available to the entity receiving the loan;

A mortgage covering all or any part of the project or by a pledge of the lease of the project;

Any other security device or requirement deemed advantageous or necessary by the board.

Loans may be made to cities, towns and counties for road or street projects. To qualify for a road or street project loan, in addition to the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, an applicant shall demonstrate that all related infrastructure including water and sewer is or will be in place at the time of receipt of the loan. No loan shall be provided under this subsection to any city, town or county that has any outstanding or unpaid loan under this subsection. Any loan under this subsection shall be at an interest rate of one percent (1%) plus seventy-five thousandths of one percent (.075%) for each year of the loan term in excess of five (5) years. In the event of prepayment of a loan, the interest rate shall be calculated at the actual loan period, but no refund of interest payment shall be made to the borrowing entity. Any loan made under this subsection shall be for a term of not fewer than five (5) years and not greater than twenty-five (25) years for repayment. The total loans under this subsection provided in any one (1) year shall not exceed one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000.00). Not more than thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000.00) of road or street loans shall be made in any one (1) year to:

Towns as defined in W.S. 15-1-101(a)(xiv);

Cities as defined in W.S. 15-1-101(a)(iv);

Counties.

Loans may be made to irrigation or water conservancy districts for replacement or major maintenance projects of storage, diversion, transmission, and distribution systems. A loan under this subsection shall be at an interest rate of the greater of one percent (1%) plus seventy-five thousandths of one percent (0.075%) for each year of the loan term in excess of five (5) years or the current equivalent yield of a United States treasury security of the same duration of the loan, which may be adjusted every five (5) years. In the event of prepayment of a loan, the interest rate shall be calculated at the actual loan period, but no refund of interest payment shall be made to the borrowing entity. Any loan made under this subsection shall be for a term of not fewer than five (5) years and not greater than twenty-five (25) years for repayment. The board shall require an irrigation or a water conservancy district to apply for other grant or loan programs prior to authorizing a loan under this subsection. Adequate security for loans shall be required and may include:

A pledge of the revenues from the project for which the loan was granted;

A pledge of other revenues available to the irrigation or water conservancy district receiving the loan;

A mortgage covering all or any part of the project or by a pledge of the lease of the project;

Any other security device or requirement deemed advantageous or necessary by the board.

No loan shall be made without the written opinion of the attorney general certifying the legality of the transaction and all documents connected therewith. An election approving the project and borrowing for the project by the qualified electors of the borrowing entity shall be required only if the attorney general determines such an election is otherwise required by law.

There is created a loss reserve account for loans made under this section. A loan origination fee of one-half of one percent (0.5%) of the loan shall be paid by the loan applicant and deposited to the loss reserve account for any loan approved under this section. If, as a result of default in the payment of any loan made under this section, there occurs a nonrecoverable loss either to the corpus of, or interest due to the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, the board shall restore the loss to the permanent fund using any funds available in the loss reserve account. If the funds in the loss reserve account are insufficient to restore the full amount of the loss, the board shall submit a detailed report of the loss to the legislature and shall request an appropriation to restore the balance of the loss to the permanent fund. Beginning June 30, 2018, the state treasurer shall transfer funds quarterly from the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund reserve account to the loss reserve account created in this subsection, in an amount necessary to ensure that as of the last day of each quarter there is an unobligated, unencumbered balance equal to five percent (5%) of the balance of outstanding loans under this section. Any funds transferred to the loss reserve account pursuant to this subsection which are not necessary to maintain the five percent (5%) balance shall be transferred back to the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund reserve account on the last day of the quarter.

As used in this section:

“Board” means the state loan and investment board to include the office of state lands and investments;

“Infrastructure project” means a capital construction project which may lawfully be undertaken within the powers of the political subdivision authorized to receive a loan under this section;

“Road or street project” means the construction, maintenance or improvement of a public street, road or alley within a city, town or county.

History.

2018 ch. 136, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 112, § 1, effective February 26, 2019; 2021 ch. 123, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2019 amendment,

in the introductory language in (a) substituted “aggregate sum of all outstanding loans” for “aggregate sum of all loans” throughout.

Laws 2019, ch. 112, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2019.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (d); and redesignated former (d) through (f) as (e) through (g).

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 136, § 17, makes the act effective July 1, 2018.